Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-1201.15
Business Recruitment Division; duties; information withheld from public.

(1) The primary responsibility of the Business Recruitment Division shall be the creation of jobs through the attraction of business to the state. The division shall develop a program of assistance to local governments, chambers of commerce, development organizations, and other entities involved in attracting new value-adding industries. Activities shall include, but not be limited to, industrial recruitment, marketing, international investment attraction, and technical assistance to community organizations in their recruitment efforts.

(2) Information regarding business recruitment, location, relocation, and expansion projects conducted by or with the assistance of the Business Recruitment Division may be withheld from the public until a public announcement by an authorized representative of the business or the Department of Economic Development is made about the project or until negotiations between the business and the division or other governmental entity regarding the project have been completed, whichever is earlier.

Laws 1986, LB 965, § 15;

Laws 1989, LB 639, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB217, § 32.